Utah statutes.
53A-11-304.   Certificate part of student's record -- Forms for certificates
-- Transfer of immunization record to official certificate.
(1)  Each school shall retain official certificates of immunization for every
enrolled student.  The certificate becomes a part of the individual student's
permanent school record and follows the student through his or her public or
private school career.
(2)  The Department of Health shall provide official certificate of
immunization forms to public and private schools, physicians, and local health
departments. The forms referred to in this subsection shall include a clear
statement of the student's rights under Section 53A-11-302.
(3)  Any immunization record provided by a licensed physician, registered
nurse, or public health official may be accepted by a school official as a
certificate of immunization if the type of immunization given and the dates
given are specified and the information is transferred to an official
certificate of immunization and verified by the school district in which the
public or private school is located.
